Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.80.041

Precinct committee officer, eligibility.

(1) Any member of a major political party who is a registered voter in the precinct and who will be at least eighteen years old by the date of the precinct committee officer election may file his or her declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW 29A.24.031 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee officer of his or her party in that precinct.

(2) Disclosure of filing information for precinct committee officer candidates who have not reached the age of 18 is the same as all candidates for precinct committee officer.

(3) When elected at the primary, the precinct committee officer shall serve so long as the committee officer remains an eligible voter in that precinct.

[ 2023 c 361 s 11; 2020 c 208 s 19; 2009 c 106 s 3; 2004 c 271 s 148.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.